Utah statutes.
78B-19-104.   Collaborative law participation agreement -- Requirements.

(1)  A collaborative law participation agreement must:

(a)  be in a record;

(b)  be signed by the parties;

(c)  state the parties' intention to resolve a collaborative matter through a collaborative law process under this chapter;

(d)  describe the nature and scope of the matter;

(e)  identify the collaborative lawyer who represents each party in the process; and

(f)  contain a statement by each collaborative lawyer confirming the lawyer's representation of a party in the collaborative law process.

(2)  Parties may agree to include in a collaborative law participation agreement additional provisions not inconsistent with this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 382, 2010 General Session

